Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.010

Declaration of purpose.

Limitations or restrictions placed on the buyer by the seller offering fresh fruit for sale as to the amount that such prospective buyer may purchase of the total amount of such fresh fruit owned, possessed or controlled by the seller, may lead to or cause confusion, deceptive trade practices, and interfere with the orderly marketing of fresh fruit necessary for the public health and welfare, and is hereby declared to be a business affected with the public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of the state for the purpose of protecting the general health and welfare of the people of this state.

[ 1965 c 61 s 1.]